Tennessee statutes. Title 53 Food, Drugs And Cosmetics
Chapter 12

Vending Machines and Commissaries [Repealed]

53-12-101. [Repealed.]

Acts 1967, ch. 68, § 1; T.C.A., § 52-1501; repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 150, § 7, effective April 17, 2017.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 12, §§ 53-12-101 — 53-12-107, concerned vending machines and commissaries.

53-12-102. [Repealed.]

Acts 1967, ch. 68, § 2; T.C.A., § 52-1502; repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 150, § 7, effective April 17, 2017.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 12, §§ 53-12-101 — 53-12-107, concerned vending machines and commissaries.

53-12-103. [Repealed.]

Acts 1967, ch. 68, § 3; T.C.A., § 52-1503; repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 150, § 7, effective April 17, 2017.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 12, §§ 53-12-101 — 53-12-107, concerned vending machines and commissaries.

53-12-104. [Repealed.]

Acts 1967, ch. 68,§§ 4, 5; T.C.A., §§ 52-1504, 52-1505; 2015, ch. 485, § 39; repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 150, § 7, effective April 17, 2017.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 12, §§ 53-12-101 — 53-12-107, concerned vending machines and commissaries.

53-12-105. [Repealed.]

Acts 1967, ch. 68, § 6; T.C.A., § 52-1506; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 150, § 7, effective April 17, 2017.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 12, §§ 53-12-101 — 53-12-107, concerned vending machines and commissaries.

53-12-106. [Repealed.]

Acts 1967, ch. 68, §§ 7-11; T.C.A., §§ 52-1507 — 52-1511; Acts 1989, ch. 147, § 5; repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 150, § 7, effective April 17, 2017.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 12, §§ 53-12-101 — 53-12-107, concerned vending machines and commissaries.

53-12-107. [Repealed.]

Acts 2009, ch. 350, § 1; repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 150, § 7, effective April 17, 2017.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 12, §§ 53-12-101 — 53-12-107, concerned vending machines and commissaries.